Maine, session 132, LD356.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 7 MRSA §604, sub-§25-B is enacted to read:
25-B. Pet. "Pet" has the same meaning as in section 712, subsection 16.
Sec. 2. 7 MRSA §606, sub-§2, ¶D, as amended by PL 2005, c. 620, §5, is further
amended to read:
D. Handle, transport, store, display or distribute pesticides in such a manner as to
endanger human beings or their pets or their environment or to endanger food, feed or
any other products that may be transported, stored, displayed or distributed with such
pesticides;
Sec. 3. 7 MRSA §606, sub-§2, ¶E, as amended by PL 2005, c. 620, §5, is further
amended to read:
E. Dispose of, discard or store any pesticides or pesticide containers in such a manner
as may cause injury to humans, vegetation, crops, livestock or pets, wildlife or
beneficial insects or pollute any water supply or waterway;
Sec. 4. 7 MRSA §606, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Unlawful use without proper notification. A person may not use any pesticide
outdoors within 500 feet of a property owned by another person unless the person provides
written notification to the owner, lessee or other legal occupant of the property of the intent
to apply pesticides at least 7 days prior to the pesticide application. This subsection does
not apply to aerial applicators as defined by the board by rule. The department shall adopt
rules governing notification requirements. Rules adopted under this subsection are routine
technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 1 - 132LR0054(01)